Nevada, session 83, SB209.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 683A of NRS is hereby amended by
adding thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 to 17, inclusive,
of this act.
Sec. 2. “Affiliated pharmacy” means a pharmacy that
directly, or indirectly through one or more intermediaries,
controls, is controlled by or is under common control with a
pharmacy benefit manager.
Sec. 3. “Claim” means a request for payment for:
1. Administering, filling or refilling a prescription drug; or
2. Providing a pharmacist service or a medical supply or
device to a covered person.
Sec. 4. “Control” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 692C.050.
Sec. 5. “Cost-sharing obligation” includes, without
limitation, a copayment, coinsurance or deductible imposed upon
or collected from a covered person in connection with filling a
prescription or obtaining other pharmacist services.
Sec. 6. “Manufacturer” has the meaning ascribed to it in 42
U.S.C. § 1396r-8(k)(5).
Sec. 7. “Network plan” means a pharmacy benefits plan
offered by a third party under which the financing and delivery of
pharmacist services is provided, in whole or in part, through a
defined set of providers under contract with the third party. The
term does not include an arrangement for the financing of
premiums.
-
*SB209*

– 4 –
Sec. 8. “Nonaffiliated pharmacy” means a pharmacy that:
1. Directly or indirectly through a pharmacy services
administrative organization contracts with a pharmacy benefit
manager; and
2. Does not control, is not controlled by and is not under
common control with the pharmacy benefit manager.
Sec. 9. “Pharmacist services” means the provision of
products, goods or services, or any combination thereof, provided
as a part of the practice of pharmacy, as defined in NRS 639.0124.
Sec. 10. “Pharmacy benefit management services” includes,
without limitation:
1. Negotiating the price of prescription drugs, including,
without limitation, negotiating or contracting for direct or indirect
rebates, discounts or price concessions on prescription drugs.
2. Managing any aspect of a pharmacy benefits plan,
including, without limitation:
(a) Developing or managing a formulary;
(b) Processing and paying claims for prescription drugs;
(c) Performing reviews of the utilization of prescription drugs;
(d) Processing requests for prior authorization for
prescriptions;
(e) Adjudicating appeals and grievances relating to a
pharmacy benefits plan;
(f) Contracting with pharmacies to provide pharmacist services
for covered persons;
(g) Managing the cost of covered prescription drugs on behalf
of a third party; and
(h) Managing or providing data relating to a pharmacy
benefits plan.
3. Performing any administrative, managerial, clinical,
pricing, financial, reimbursement, data administration, reporting
or billing service for a third party in relation to a pharmacy
benefits plan.
Sec. 11. “Pharmacy services administrative organization”
means an entity that provides contracting and other administrative
services relating to prescription drug benefits to pharmacies.
Sec. 12. “Rebate” means any discount, remuneration or
other payment paid by a manufacturer or wholesaler to a
pharmacy benefit manager after a claim has been adjudicated or
completed at a pharmacy. The term does not include a bona fide
service fee, as defined in 42 C.F.R. § 447.502.
Sec. 13. “Wholesaler” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 639.016.
Sec. 14. 1. A pharmacy benefit manager that manages a
network plan shall not:
-
*SB209*

– 5 –
(a) Require a covered person to use an affiliated pharmacy to
fill a prescription or obtain other pharmacist services if there is a
nonaffiliated pharmacy in the network;
(b) Except as authorized by subsection 2, induce, persuade or
attempt to induce or persuade a covered person to transfer a
prescription to or otherwise use an affiliated pharmacy instead of
a nonaffiliated pharmacy in the network;
(c) Unreasonably restrict a covered person from using a
particular pharmacy in the network for the purpose of filling a
prescription or receiving pharmacist services covered by the
pharmacy benefits plan of the covered person;
(d) Communicate to a covered person that the covered person
is required to have a prescription filled or receive other pharmacist
services at a particular pharmacy if there are other pharmacies in
the network that have the ability to dispense the prescription or
provide the pharmacist services required by the covered person;
(e) Unreasonably obstruct or interfere with the ability of a
covered person to timely access a prescription drug or device that
has been prescribed to the covered person at a pharmacy of the
person’s choice, including, without limitation, a nonaffiliated
pharmacy;
(f) Discriminate against a nonaffiliated pharmacy based on the
nonaffiliated status of the pharmacy, including, without limitation,
by:
(1) Offering materially different terms or conditions to a
nonaffiliated pharmacy based on the status as a nonaffiliated
pharmacy;
(2) Refusing to renew or terminating a contract with a
nonaffiliated pharmacy on the basis that the pharmacy is a
nonaffiliated pharmacy, or for reasons other than those that apply
equally to affiliated pharmacies; and
(3) Reimbursing a nonaffiliated pharmacy for a pharmacist
service in an amount that is less than the pharmacy benefit
manager would reimburse an affiliated pharmacy for the same
pharmacist service; or
(g) Deny a pharmacy the opportunity to participate in a
network or receive a preferred status if the pharmacy is willing to
accept the same terms and conditions that the pharmacy benefit
manager has established for affiliated pharmacies as a condition
for participating in the network or receiving preferred status, as
applicable.
2. A third party or pharmacy benefit manager may reduce the
amount of an applicable cost-sharing obligation of a covered
person who fills a prescription or obtains other pharmacist
services at a particular pharmacy. The third party or pharmacy
-
*SB209*

– 6 –
benefit manager must reduce the cost-sharing obligation to an
amount that is less than the cost-sharing obligation that the
covered person would otherwise pay to fill the same prescription or
obtain the same pharmacist services at any other pharmacy in the
network under the terms of the applicable pharmacy benefits plan.
3. As used in this section, “network” means a defined set of
pharmacies that are under contract to provide pharmacist services
pursuant to a network plan.
Sec. 15. A pharmacy benefit manager shall:
1. Upon the request of a third party for which the pharmacy
benefit manager manages a pharmacy benefits plan, disclose to
the third party, in writing, the amounts and types of charges, fees
and commissions that the pharmacy benefit manager charges the
third party for providing pharmacy benefit management services
or otherwise receives in connection with managing the pharmacy
benefits plan of the third party, including, without limitation,
administrative fees and rebates collected from manufacturers and
wholesalers.
2. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 422.4053, transmit
the entire amount of any rebate received from a manufacturer or
wholesaler in connection with providing pharmacy benefit
management services for a third party in the following order of
priority:
(a) To the covered person who receives the drug to which the
rebate pertains by directly transmitting the rebate, or an equivalent
credit, to the pharmacy that dispenses the drug to be applied at the
point-of-sale for the purpose of offsetting or reducing the cost-
sharing obligation of the covered person.
(b) To the third party.
Sec. 16. 1. A pharmacy benefit manager shall not:
(a) Use spread pricing.
(b) Enter into, amend, enforce or renew a contract with a
manufacturer that expressly or implicitly provides for the
exclusive coverage of a drug, medical device or other product by a
pharmacy benefits plan or group of pharmacy benefits plans.
(c) Make or disseminate any statement, representation or
advertisement that is, or reasonably should be known to be,
untrue, deceptive or misleading.
2. As used in this section, “spread pricing” means any
technique by which a pharmacy benefit manager charges or
claims an amount from a third party for services provided by a
pharmacy or pharmacist that is different from the amount the
pharmacy benefit manager pays the pharmacy or pharmacist, as
applicable, for those services.
-
*SB209*

– 7 –
Sec. 17. 1. On or before April 1 of each year, a pharmacy
benefit manager shall submit to the Commissioner:
(a) A report which includes the information prescribed by
subsection 2; and
(b) A statement signed under the penalty of perjury affirming
the accuracy of the information in the report.
2. The report submitted pursuant to paragraph (a) of
subsection 1 must include:
(a) Lists of:
(1) The 50 prescription drugs with the highest wholesale
acquisition costs at the time the report is submitted;
(2) The 50 prescription drugs most frequently prescribed to
covered persons in this State during the immediately preceding
calendar year; and
(3) The 50 prescription drugs which produced the largest
amount of revenue for the pharmacy benefit manager in this State
during the immediately preceding calendar year.
(b) For each prescription for a drug included on a list
compiled pursuant to paragraph (a) that was issued to a covered
person within the immediately preceding year:
(1) The type of pharmacy that filled the prescription. The
type of pharmacy may be an integrated pharmacy, chain
pharmacy, specialty pharmacy, mail order pharmacy or other type
of pharmacy.
(2) Information relating to pricing of and rebates for the
drug, including, without limitation:
(I) The total amount that the pharmacy benefit manager
paid to the pharmacy for filling the prescription;
(II) The net amount that the pharmacy benefit manager
paid to the pharmacy for filling the prescription, after accounting
for any fees or assessments imposed by the pharmacy benefit
manager against the pharmacy;
(III) The amount of any rebate negotiated by the
pharmacy benefit manager with the manufacturer for the
purchase of the drug;
(IV) The amount of any rebate described in sub-
subparagraph (III) that was passed on to either the applicable
third party or the covered person; and
(V) The amount that the applicable third party paid the
pharmacy benefit manager for the drug.
(c) Information prescribed by regulation of the Commissioner
that allows the Commissioner to determine whether each claim for
a prescription drug included on a list compiled pursuant to
paragraph (a) required prior authorization. Such information
must be in deidentified form.
-
*SB209*

– 8 –
(d) For each prescription drug appearing on a list compiled
pursuant to paragraph (a), the aggregate amount for the
immediately preceding year of the:
(1) Cost of the drug, based on the total units of the drug
dispensed to covered persons in this State multiplied by the
wholesale acquisition cost of the drug at the time each unit was
dispensed;
(2) Amount of rebates negotiated for the purchase of the
drug in this State;
(3) Amount of administrative fees received from a
manufacturer or wholesaler for services provided in this State
relating to the drug;
(4) Amount paid or reimbursed to affiliated pharmacies in
this State for the drug; and
(5) Amount paid or reimbursed to nonaffiliated pharmacies
in this State for the drug.
(e) A list of the third parties with which the pharmacy benefit
manager has contracted, the scope of services provided to each
third party and the number of persons covered in this State by
each third party listed.
(f) The total amount of revenue derived from providing
pharmacy benefit management services in this State in the
immediately preceding year.
(g) The expenses incurred by providing pharmacy benefit
management services in this State in the immediately preceding
year.
(h) The identity of each group purchasing organization
employed, contracted or otherwise utilized by or affiliated with the
pharmacy benefit manager.
(i) A copy of each contract entered into with a group
purchasing organization identified pursuant to paragraph (h).
(j) The aggregate financial benefit derived in the immediately
preceding year from the use of the group purchasing
organizations identified pursuant to paragraph (h).
(k) A list of the types and amounts of fees that the pharmacy
benefit manager has collected during the immediately preceding
year for performing pharmacy benefit management services in this
State and a description of how those fees are calculated.
(l) A copy of all fee agreements entered into with third parties,
pharmacies and pharmacy services administrative organizations
doing business in this State.
(m) The amount of each premium, deductible, cost-sharing
obligation or fee charged by the pharmacy benefit manager to
covered persons in this State or other persons on behalf of such
covered persons.
-
*SB209*

– 9 –
3. On or before July 1 of each even-numbered year, the
Commissioner shall:
(a) Compile a report on the overall impact of pharmacy benefit
managers on the cost of prescription drugs in this State based on
the reports submitted to the Commissioner pursuant to subsection
1. The data in the report compiled pursuant to this subsection
must be in aggregated form and must not reveal specific
information concerning an individual purchaser or manufacturer
of a drug, including, without limitation, information relating to a
manufacturer’s individual or aggregate discounted prices.
(b) Submit the report to the Director of the Legislative Counsel
Bureau for transmittal to the Joint Interim Standing Committee
on Health and Human Services and the Joint Interim Standing
Committee on Commerce and Labor.
(c) Present the report at a meeting of the Joint Interim
Standing Committee on Health and Human Services.
(d) Post the report on an Internet website operated by the
Division.
4. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, any
information submitted by a pharmacy benefit manager pursuant to
this section is confidential and is not a public record.
5. Nothing in this section shall be construed to impose any
recordkeeping obligation on a third party for which a pharmacy
benefit manager manages a pharmacy benefits plan.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Group purchasing organization” means a person
employed, contracted or otherwise utilized by or affiliated with a
pharmacy benefit manager to negotiate, obtain or procure rebates
from manufacturers or wholesalers.
(b) “National Drug Code” means the numerical code assigned
to a prescription drug by the United States Food and Drug
Administration.
(c) “Wholesale acquisition cost” means the manufacturer’s
published list price for a prescription drug with a unique National
Drug Code for sale to a wholesaler or any other purchaser or
entity that purchases the prescription drug from the manufacturer,
not including any rebates or other price concessions.
Sec. 18. NRS 683A.171 is hereby amended to read as follows:
683A.171 As used in NRS 683A.171 to 683A.179, inclusive,
and sections 2 to 17, inclusive, of this act, unless the context
otherwise requires, the words and terms defined in NRS 683A.172
to 683A.176, inclusive, and sections 2 to 13, inclusive, of this act
have the meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
-
*SB209*

– 10 –
Sec. 19. NRS 683A.175 is hereby amended to read as follows:
683A.175 “Pharmacy benefits plan” means coverage of
prescription drugs and pharmacist services provided by a third
party.
Sec. 20. NRS 683A.177 is hereby amended to read as follows:
683A.177 1. Except as otherwise provided in [subsection]
subsections 2 [,] and 3, the requirements of NRS 683A.171 to
683A.179, inclusive, and sections 2 to 17, inclusive, of this act and
any regulations adopted by the Commissioner pursuant thereto do
not apply to the coverage of prescription drugs under a plan that is
subject to the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 or
any information relating to such coverage.
2. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the
provisions of NRS 683A.179, except for paragraph (d) of
subsection 1 of NRS 683A.179, section 15 of this act, except for
paragraph (a) of subsection 2 of section 15 of this act, and
paragraphs (a) and (c) of subsection 1 of section 16 of this act
apply to the coverage of prescription drugs under a plan that is
subject to the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974
or any information relating to such coverage. Except where
required pursuant to subsection 3, a pharmacy benefit manager is
not required to include in a report submitted pursuant to section
17 of this act any information:
(a) Derived from data relating to claims administered or
coverage provided under such a plan; or
(b) Specifically relating to or that otherwise reveals the details
of the administration of such a plan.
[2.] 3. A plan described in subsection 1 may, by contract,
require a pharmacy benefit manager that manages the coverage of
prescription drugs under the plan to comply with the requirements
of NRS 683A.171 to 683A.179, inclusive, and sections 2 to 17,
inclusive, of this act and any regulations adopted by the
Commissioner pursuant thereto.
Sec. 21. NRS 683A.179 is hereby amended to read as follows:
683A.179 1. A pharmacy benefit manager shall not:
(a) Prohibit a pharmacist or pharmacy from providing
information to a covered person concerning:
(1) The amount of any copayment or coinsurance for a
prescription drug; or
(2) The availability of a less expensive alternative or generic
drug including, without limitation, information concerning clinical
efficacy of such a drug;
(b) Penalize a pharmacist or pharmacy for providing the
information described in paragraph (a) or selling a less expensive
alternative or generic drug to a covered person;
-
*SB209*

– 11 –
(c) Prohibit a pharmacy from offering or providing delivery
services directly to a covered person as an ancillary service of the
pharmacy; [or]
(d) If the pharmacy benefit manager manages a pharmacy
benefits plan that provides coverage through a network plan, charge
a copayment or coinsurance for a prescription drug in an amount
that is greater than the total amount paid to a pharmacy that is in the
network of providers under contract with the third party [.] ;
(e) Restrict, by contract or otherwise, the ability of a pharmacy
to share or disclose the details of a contract between the pharmacy
and the pharmacy benefit manager with a trade organization for
pharmacies or the Commissioner;
(f) Reimburse a pharmacy for a prescription drug in an
amount that is less than the pharmacy pays a wholesaler for the
prescription drug, as reflected on the invoice provided by the
wholesaler to the pharmacy;
(g) Directly or indirectly reduce or allow the reduction of any
payment to a pharmacy under a pharmacy benefits plan managed
by the pharmacy benefit manager under a reconciliation process
to an effective rate of reimbursement;
(h) Directly or indirectly retroactively reduce or deny a claim
after the claim has been adjudicated unless:
(1) The original claim is fraudulent;
(2) The original payment of the claim was incorrect
because the pharmacy or pharmacist had already been paid for the
pharmacist services to which the claim relates; or
(3) The pharmacy or pharmacist that submitted the claim
did not properly render the pharmacist services to which the claim
relates;
(i) Reverse and resubmit the claim of a pharmacy:
(1) Without notifying and attempting to reconcile the claim
with the pharmacy; or
(2) More than 90 days after the claim was first affirmatively
adjudicated;
(j) Charge a pharmacy or a pharmacist a fee to process a claim
electronically;
(k) Refuse to pay a claim after terminating a contract with a
pharmacy, except where the pharmacy benefit manager is
investigating possible insurance fraud; or
(l) Retaliate against a pharmacy for reporting a potential or
actual violation of this title or attempting to settle a dispute with a
pharmacy benefit manager based on a potential or actual violation
of this title.
2. The provisions of this section:
-
*SB209*

– 12 –
(a) Must not be construed to authorize a pharmacist to dispense
a drug that has not been prescribed by a practitioner, as defined in
NRS 639.0125, except to the extent authorized by a specific
provision of law, including, without limitation, NRS 453C.120,
639.28078 and 639.28085.
(b) Do not apply to an institutional pharmacy, as defined in NRS
639.0085, or a pharmacist working in such a pharmacy as an
employee or independent contractor.
3. Any provision of a contract that restricts the ability of a
pharmacy to share information pursuant to paragraph (e) of
subsection 1 is against public policy, void and unenforceable.
4. A pharmacy may bring an action for statutory damages
against a pharmacy benefit manager who retaliates against the
pharmacy in violation of paragraph (l) of subsection 1. If the
pharmacy prevails in such an action, the court shall award
the pharmacy $5,000 for each violation, in addition to attorney’s
fees and costs.
5. As used in this section, [“network plan” means a health
benefit plan offered by a health carrier under which the financing
and delivery of medical care is provided, in whole or in part,
through a defined set of providers under contract with the carrier.
The term does not include an arrangement for the financing of
premiums.] “retaliate” includes, without limitation:
(a) Terminating or refusing to renew a contract with a
pharmacy.
(b) Making the renewal of a contract with a pharmacy
contingent on the pharmacy acceding to terms and conditions not
applicable to other pharmacies.
(c) Subjecting the pharmacy to increased audits.
(d) Failing to promptly pay or reimburse a pharmacy without
substantial justification.
Sec. 22. Chapter 689A of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. An insurer that uses a pharmacy benefit manager to
manage coverage of prescription drugs included in a policy of
health insurance shall use any money received from the pharmacy
benefit manager pursuant to section 15 of this act for the sole
purpose of reducing premiums and offsetting or reducing cost-
sharing obligations of insureds.
2. As used in this section:
(a) “Cost-sharing obligation” has the meaning ascribed to it in
section 5 of this act.
(b) “Pharmacy benefit manager” has the meaning ascribed to
it in NRS 683A.174.
-
*SB209*

– 13 –
Sec. 23. NRS 689A.330 is hereby amended to read as follows:
689A.330 If any policy is issued by a domestic insurer for
delivery to a person residing in another state, and if the insurance
commissioner or corresponding public officer of that other state has
informed the Commissioner that the policy is not subject to approval
or disapproval by that officer, the Commissioner may by ruling
require that the policy meet the standards set forth in NRS 689A.030
to 689A.320, inclusive [.] , and section 22 of this act.
Sec. 24. Chapter 689B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. An insurer that uses a pharmacy benefit manager to
manage coverage of prescription drugs included in a policy of
group health insurance shall use any money received from the
pharmacy benefit manager pursuant to section 15 of this act for
the sole purpose of reducing premiums and offsetting or reducing
cost-sharing obligations of insureds.
2. As used in this section:
(a) “Cost-sharing obligation” has the meaning ascribed to it in
section 5 of this act.
(b) “Pharmacy benefit manager” has the meaning ascribed to
it in NRS 683A.174.
Sec. 25. Chapter 689C of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A carrier that uses a pharmacy benefit manager to manage
coverage of prescription drugs included in a health benefit plan
shall use any money received from the pharmacy benefit manager
pursuant to section 15 of this act for the sole purpose of reducing
premiums and offsetting or reducing cost-sharing obligations of
insureds.
2. As used in this section:
(a) “Cost-sharing obligation” has the meaning ascribed to it in
section 5 of this act.
(b) “Pharmacy benefit manager” has the meaning ascribed to
it in NRS 683A.174.
Sec. 26. NRS 689C.425 is hereby amended to read as follows:
689C.425 A voluntary purchasing group and any contract
issued to such a group pursuant to NRS 689C.360 to 689C.600,
inclusive, are subject to the provisions of NRS 689C.015 to
689C.355, inclusive, and section 25 of this act, to the extent
applicable and not in conflict with the express provisions of NRS
687B.408 and 689C.360 to 689C.600, inclusive.
Sec. 27. Chapter 695A of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A society that uses a pharmacy benefit manager to manage
coverage of prescription drugs included in a benefit contract shall
-
*SB209*

– 14 –
use any money received from the pharmacy benefit manager
pursuant to section 15 of this act for the sole purpose of reducing
premiums and offsetting or reducing cost-sharing obligations of
insureds.
2. As used in this section:
(a) “Cost-sharing obligation” has the meaning ascribed to it in
section 5 of this act.
(b) “Pharmacy benefit manager” has the meaning ascribed to
it in NRS 683A.174.
Sec. 28. Chapter 695B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A hospital or medical services corporation that uses a
pharmacy benefit manager to manage coverage of prescription
drugs included in a policy of health insurance shall use any
money received from the pharmacy benefit manager pursuant to
section 15 of this act for the sole purpose of reducing premiums
and offsetting or reducing cost-sharing obligations of insureds.
2. As used in this section:
(a) “Cost-sharing obligation” has the meaning ascribed to it in
section 5 of this act.
(b) “Pharmacy benefit manager” has the meaning ascribed to
it in NRS 683A.174.
Sec. 29. Chapter 695C of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A health maintenance organization that uses a pharmacy
benefit manager to manage coverage of prescription drugs
included in a health care plan shall use any money received from
the pharmacy benefit manager pursuant to section 15 of this act
for the sole purpose of reducing premiums and offsetting or
reducing cost-sharing obligations of enrollees.
2. As used in this section:
(a) “Cost-sharing obligation” has the meaning ascribed to it in
section 5 of this act.
(b) “Pharmacy benefit manager” has the meaning ascribed to
it in NRS 683A.174.
Sec. 30. NRS 695C.050 is hereby amended to read as follows:
695C.050 1. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter or
in specific provisions of this title, the provisions of this title are not
applicable to any health maintenance organization granted a
certificate of authority under this chapter. This provision does not
apply to an insurer licensed and regulated pursuant to this title
except with respect to its activities as a health maintenance
organization authorized and regulated pursuant to this chapter.
2. Solicitation of enrollees by a health maintenance
organization granted a certificate of authority, or its representatives,
-
*SB209*

– 15 –
must not be construed to violate any provision of law relating to
solicitation or advertising by practitioners of a healing art.
3. Any health maintenance organization authorized under this
chapter shall not be deemed to be practicing medicine and is exempt
from the provisions of chapter 630 of NRS.
4. The provisions of NRS 695C.110, 695C.125, 695C.1691,
695C.1693, 695C.170, 695C.1703, 695C.1705, 695C.1709 to
695C.173, inclusive, 695C.1733, 695C.17335, 695C.1734,
695C.1751, 695C.1755, 695C.1759, 695C.176 to 695C.200,
inclusive, and 695C.265 and section 29 of this act do not apply to a
health maintenance organization that provides health care services
through managed care to recipients of Medicaid under the State Plan
for Medicaid or insurance pursuant to the Children’s Health
Insurance Program pursuant to a contract with the Division of
Health Care Financing and Policy of the Department of Health and
Human Services. This subsection does not exempt a health
maintenance organization from any provision of this chapter for
services provided pursuant to any other contract.
5. The provisions of NRS 695C.16932 to 695C.1699,
inclusive, 695C.1701, 695C.1708, 695C.1728, 695C.1731,
695C.17333, 695C.17345, 695C.17347, 695C.1736 to 695C.1745,
inclusive, 695C.1757 and 695C.204 apply to a health maintenance
organization that provides health care services through managed
care to recipients of Medicaid under the State Plan for Medicaid.
6. The provisions of NRS 695C.17095 do not apply to a health
maintenance organization that provides health care services to
members of the Public Employees’ Benefits Program. This
subsection does not exempt a health maintenance organization from
any provision of this chapter for services provided pursuant to any
other contract.
7. The provisions of NRS 695C.1735 do not apply to a health
maintenance organization that provides health care services to:
(a) The officers and employees, and the dependents of officers
and employees, of the governing body of any county, school district,
municipal corporation, political subdivision, public corporation or
other local governmental agency of this State; or
(b) Members of the Public Employees’ Benefits Program.
 This subsection does not exempt a health maintenance
organization from any provision of this chapter for services
provided pursuant to any other contract.
Sec. 31. NRS 695C.330 is hereby amended to read as follows:
695C.330 1. The Commissioner may suspend or revoke any
certificate of authority issued to a health maintenance organization
pursuant to the provisions of this chapter if the Commissioner finds
that any of the following conditions exist:
-
*SB209*

– 16 –
(a) The health maintenance organization is operating
significantly in contravention of its basic organizational document,
its health care plan or in a manner contrary to that described in and
reasonably inferred from any other information submitted pursuant
to NRS 695C.060, 695C.070 and 695C.140, unless any amendments
to those submissions have been filed with and approved by the
Commissioner;
(b) The health maintenance organization issues evidence of
coverage or uses a schedule of charges for health care services
which do not comply with the requirements of NRS 695C.1691 to
695C.200, inclusive, and section 29 of this act or NRS 695C.204 or
695C.207;
(c) The health care plan does not furnish comprehensive health
care services as provided for in NRS 695C.060;
(d) The Commissioner certifies that the health maintenance
organization:
(1) Does not meet the requirements of subsection 1 of NRS
695C.080; or
(2) Is unable to fulfill its obligations to furnish health care
services as required under its health care plan;
(e) The health maintenance organization is no longer financially
responsible and may reasonably be expected to be unable to meet its
obligations to enrollees or prospective enrollees;
(f) The health maintenance organization has failed to put into
effect a mechanism affording the enrollees an opportunity to
participate in matters relating to the content of programs pursuant to
NRS 695C.110;
(g) The health maintenance organization has failed to put into
effect the system required by NRS 695C.260 for:
(1) Resolving complaints in a manner reasonably to dispose
of valid complaints; and
(2) Conducting external reviews of adverse determinations
that comply with the provisions of NRS 695G.241 to 695G.310,
inclusive;
(h) The health maintenance organization or any person on its
behalf has advertised or merchandised its services in an untrue,
misrepresentative, misleading, deceptive or unfair manner;
(i) The continued operation of the health maintenance
organization would be hazardous to its enrollees or creditors or to
the general public;
(j) The health maintenance organization fails to provide the
coverage required by NRS 695C.1691; or
(k) The health maintenance organization has otherwise failed to
comply substantially with the provisions of this chapter.
-
*SB209*

– 17 –
2. A certificate of authority must be suspended or revoked only
after compliance with the requirements of NRS 695C.340.
3. If the certificate of authority of a health maintenance
organization is suspended, the health maintenance organization shall
not, during the period of that suspension, enroll any additional
groups or new individual contracts, unless those groups or persons
were contracted for before the date of suspension.
4. If the certificate of authority of a health maintenance
organization is revoked, the organization shall proceed, immediately
following the effective date of the order of revocation, to wind up its
affairs and shall conduct no further business except as may be
essential to the orderly conclusion of the affairs of the organization.
It shall engage in no further advertising or solicitation of any kind.
The Commissioner may, by written order, permit such further
operation of the organization as the Commissioner may find to be in
the best interest of enrollees to the end that enrollees are afforded
the greatest practical opportunity to obtain continuing coverage for
health care.
Sec. 32. Chapter 695F of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A prepaid limited health service organization that uses a
pharmacy benefit manager to manage coverage of prescription
drugs included in a limited health service shall use any money
received from the pharmacy benefit manager pursuant to section
15 of this act for the sole purpose of reducing premiums and
offsetting or reducing cost-sharing obligations of enrollees.
2. As used in this section:
(a) “Cost-sharing obligation” has the meaning ascribed to it in
section 5 of this act.
(b) “Pharmacy benefit manager” has the meaning ascribed to
it in NRS 683A.174.
Sec. 33. Chapter 695G of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A managed care organization that uses a pharmacy benefit
manager to manage coverage of prescription drugs included in a
health care plan shall use any money received from the pharmacy
benefit manager pursuant to section 15 of this act for the sole
purpose of reducing premiums and offsetting or reducing cost-
sharing obligations of insureds.
2. As used in this section:
(a) “Cost-sharing obligation” has the meaning ascribed to it in
section 5 of this act.
(b) “Pharmacy benefit manager” has the meaning ascribed to
it in NRS 683A.174.
-
*SB209*

– 18 –
Sec. 34. NRS 695G.090 is hereby amended to read as follows:
695G.090 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3,
the provisions of this chapter apply to each organization and insurer
that operates as a managed care organization and may include,
without limitation, an insurer that issues a policy of health
insurance, an insurer that issues a policy of individual or group
health insurance, a carrier serving small employers, a fraternal
benefit society, a hospital or medical service corporation and a
health maintenance organization.
2. In addition to the provisions of this chapter, each managed
care organization shall comply with:
(a) The provisions of chapter 686A of NRS, including all
obligations and remedies set forth therein; and
(b) Any other applicable provision of this title.
3. The provisions of NRS 695G.127, 695G.1639, 695G.164,
695G.1645, 695G.167 and 695G.200 to 695G.230, inclusive, and
section 33 of this act do not apply to a managed care organization
that provides health care services to recipients of Medicaid under
the State Plan for Medicaid or insurance pursuant to the Children’s
Health Insurance Program pursuant to a contract with the Division
of Health Care Financing and Policy of the Department of Health
and Human Services.
4. The provisions of NRS 695C.1735 and 695G.1639 do not
apply to a managed care organization that provides health care
services to members of the Public Employees’ Benefits Program.
5. Subsections 3 and 4 do not exempt a managed care
organization from any provision of this chapter for services
provided pursuant to any other contract.
Sec. 35. NRS 239.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
239.010 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section and
NRS 1.4683, 1.4687, 1A.110, 3.2203, 41.0397, 41.071, 49.095,
49.293, 62D.420, 62D.440, 62E.516, 62E.620, 62H.025, 62H.030,
62H.170, 62H.220, 62H.320, 75A.100, 75A.150, 76.160, 78.152,
80.113, 81.850, 82.183, 86.246, 86.54615, 87.515, 87.5413,
87A.200, 87A.580, 87A.640, 88.3355, 88.5927, 88.6067, 88A.345,
88A.7345, 89.045, 89.251, 90.730, 91.160, 116.757, 116A.270,
116B.880, 118B.026, 119.260, 119.265, 119.267, 119.280,
119A.280, 119A.653, 119A.677, 119B.370, 119B.382, 120A.640,
120A.690, 125.130, 125B.140, 126.141, 126.161, 126.163, 126.730,
127.007, 127.057, 127.130, 127.140, 127.2817, 128.090, 130.312,
130.712, 136.050, 159.044, 159A.044, 164.041, 172.075, 172.245,
176.01334, 176.01385, 176.015, 176.0625, 176.09129, 176.156,
176A.630, 178.39801, 178.4715, 178.5691, 178.5717, 179.495,
179A.070, 179A.165, 179D.160, 180.600, 200.3771, 200.3772,
200.5095, 200.604, 202.3662, 205.4651, 209.392, 209.3923,
-
*SB209*

– 19 –
209.3925, 209.419, 209.429, 209.521, 211A.140, 213.010, 213.040,
213.095, 213.131, 217.105, 217.110, 217.464, 217.475, 218A.350,
218E.625, 218F.150, 218G.130, 218G.240, 218G.350, 218G.615,
224.240, 226.462, 226.796, 228.270, 228.450, 228.495, 228.570,
231.069, 231.1285, 231.1473, 232.1369, 233.190, 237.300,
239.0105, 239.0113, 239.014, 239B.026, 239B.030, 239B.040,
239B.050, 239C.140, 239C.210, 239C.230, 239C.250, 239C.270,
239C.420, 240.007, 241.020, 241.030, 241.039, 242.105, 244.264,
244.335, 247.540, 247.545, 247.550, 247.560, 250.087, 250.130,
250.140, 250.145, 250.150, 268.095, 268.0978, 268.490, 268.910,
269.174, 271A.105, 281.195, 281.805, 281A.350, 281A.680,
281A.685, 281A.750, 281A.755, 281A.780, 284.4068, 284.4086,
286.110, 286.118, 287.0438, 289.025, 289.080, 289.387, 289.830,
293.4855, 293.5002, 293.503, 293.504, 293.558, 293.5757, 293.870,
293.906, 293.908, 293.909, 293.910, 293B.135, 293D.510, 331.110,
332.061, 332.351, 333.333, 333.335, 338.070, 338.1379, 338.1593,
338.1725, 338.1727, 348.420, 349.597, 349.775, 353.205,
353A.049, 353A.085, 353A.100, 353C.240, 353D.250, 360.240,
360.247, 360.255, 360.755, 361.044, 361.2242, 361.610, 365.138,
366.160, 368A.180, 370.257, 370.327, 372A.080, 378.290, 378.300,
379.0075, 379.008, 379.1495, 385A.830, 385B.100, 387.626,
387.631, 388.1455, 388.259, 388.501, 388.503, 388.513, 388.750,
388A.247, 388A.249, 391.033, 391.035, 391.0365, 391.120,
391.925, 392.029, 392.147, 392.264, 392.271, 392.315, 392.317,
392.325, 392.327, 392.335, 392.850, 393.045, 394.167, 394.16975,
394.1698, 394.447, 394.460, 394.465, 396.1415, 396.1425, 396.143,
396.159, 396.3295, 396.405, 396.525, 396.535, 396.9685,
398A.115, 408.3885, 408.3886, 408.3888, 408.5484, 412.153,
414.280, 416.070, 422.2749, 422.305, 422A.342, 422A.350,
425.400, 427A.1236, 427A.872, 427A.940, 432.028, 432.205,
432B.175, 432B.280, 432B.290, 432B.4018, 432B.407, 432B.430,
432B.560, 432B.5902, 432C.140, 432C.150, 433.534, 433A.360,
439.4941, 439.4988, 439.5282, 439.840, 439.914, 439A.116,
439A.124, 439B.420, 439B.754, 439B.760, 439B.845, 440.170,
441A.195, 441A.220, 441A.230, 442.330, 442.395, 442.735,
442.774, 445A.665, 445B.570, 445B.7773, 449.209, 449.245,
449.4315, 449A.112, 450.140, 450B.188, 450B.805, 453.164,
453.720, 458.055, 458.280, 459.050, 459.3866, 459.555, 459.7056,
459.846, 463.120, 463.15993, 463.240, 463.3403, 463.3407,
463.790, 467.1005, 480.535, 480.545, 480.935, 480.940, 481.063,
481.091, 481.093, 482.170, 482.368, 482.5536, 483.340, 483.363,
483.575, 483.659, 483.800, 484A.469, 484B.830, 484B.833,
484E.070, 485.316, 501.344, 503.452, 522.040, 534A.031, 561.285,
571.160, 584.655, 587.877, 598.0964, 598.098, 598A.110,
598A.420, 599B.090, 603.070, 603A.210, 604A.303, 604A.710,
-
*SB209*

– 20 –
604D.500, 604D.600, 612.265, 616B.012, 616B.015, 616B.315,
616B.350, 618.341, 618.425, 622.238, 622.310, 623.131, 623A.137,
624.110, 624.265, 624.327, 625.425, 625A.185, 628.418, 628B.230,
628B.760, 629.043, 629.047, 629.069, 630.133, 630.2671,
630.2672, 630.2673, 630.2687, 630.30665, 630.336, 630A.327,
630A.555, 631.332, 631.368, 632.121, 632.125, 632.3415,
632.3423, 632.405, 633.283, 633.301, 633.427, 633.4715, 633.4716,
633.4717, 633.524, 634.055, 634.1303, 634.214, 634A.169,
634A.185, 634B.730, 635.111, 635.158, 636.262, 636.342, 637.085,
637.145, 637B.192, 637B.288, 638.087, 638.089, 639.183,
639.2485, 639.570, 640.075, 640.152, 640A.185, 640A.220,
640B.405, 640B.730, 640C.580, 640C.600, 640C.620, 640C.745,
640C.760, 640D.135, 640D.190, 640E.225, 640E.340, 641.090,
641.221, 641.2215, 641A.191, 641A.217, 641A.262, 641B.170,
641B.281, 641B.282, 641C.455, 641C.760, 641D.260, 641D.320,
642.524, 643.189, 644A.870, 645.180, 645.625, 645A.050,
645A.082, 645B.060, 645B.092, 645C.220, 645C.225, 645D.130,
645D.135, 645G.510, 645H.320, 645H.330, 647.0945, 647.0947,
648.033, 648.197, 649.065, 649.067, 652.126, 652.228, 653.900,
654.110, 656.105, 657A.510, 661.115, 665.130, 665.133, 669.275,
669.285, 669A.310, 670B.680, 671.365, 671.415, 673.450, 673.480,
675.380, 676A.340, 676A.370, 677.243, 678A.470, 678C.710,
678C.800, 679B.122, 679B.124, 679B.152, 679B.159, 679B.190,
679B.285, 679B.690, 680A.270, 681A.440, 681B.260, 681B.410,
681B.540, 683A.0873, 685A.077, 686A.289, 686B.170, 686C.306,
687A.060, 687A.115, 687B.404, 687C.010, 688C.230, 688C.480,
688C.490, 689A.696, 692A.117, 692C.190, 692C.3507, 692C.3536,
692C.3538, 692C.354, 692C.420, 693A.480, 693A.615, 696B.550,
696C.120, 703.196, 704B.325, 706.1725, 706A.230, 710.159,
711.600, and section 17 of this act, sections 35, 38 and 41 of
chapter 478, Statutes of Nevada 2011 and section 2 of chapter 391,
Statutes of Nevada 2013 and unless otherwise declared by law to be
confidential, all public books and public records of a governmental
entity must be open at all times during office hours to inspection by
any person, and may be fully copied or an abstract or memorandum
may be prepared from those public books and public records. Any
such copies, abstracts or memoranda may be used to supply the
general public with copies, abstracts or memoranda of the records or
may be used in any other way to the advantage of the governmental
entity or of the general public. This section does not supersede or in
any manner affect the federal laws governing copyrights or enlarge,
diminish or affect in any other manner the rights of a person in any
written book or record which is copyrighted pursuant to federal law.
2. A governmental entity may not reject a book or record
which is copyrighted solely because it is copyrighted.
-
*SB209*

– 21 –
3. A governmental entity that has legal custody or control of a
public book or record shall not deny a request made pursuant to
subsection 1 to inspect or copy or receive a copy of a public book or
record on the basis that the requested public book or record contains
information that is confidential if the governmental entity can
redact, delete, conceal or separate, including, without limitation,
electronically, the confidential information from the information
included in the public book or record that is not otherwise
confidential.
4. If requested, a governmental entity shall provide a copy of a
public record in an electronic format by means of an electronic
medium. Nothing in this subsection requires a governmental entity
to provide a copy of a public record in an electronic format or by
means of an electronic medium if:
(a) The public record:
(1) Was not created or prepared in an electronic format; and
(2) Is not available in an electronic format; or
(b) Providing the public record in an electronic format or by
means of an electronic medium would:
(1) Give access to proprietary software; or
(2) Require the production of information that is confidential
and that cannot be redacted, deleted, concealed or separated from
information that is not otherwise confidential.
5. An officer, employee or agent of a governmental entity who
has legal custody or control of a public record:
(a) Shall not refuse to provide a copy of that public record in the
medium that is requested because the officer, employee or agent has
already prepared or would prefer to provide the copy in a different
medium.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 239.030, shall, upon
request, prepare the copy of the public record and shall not require
the person who has requested the copy to prepare the copy himself
or herself.
Sec. 36. NRS 287.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
287.010 1. The governing body of any county, school
district, municipal corporation, political subdivision, public
corporation or other local governmental agency of the State of
Nevada may:
(a) Adopt and carry into effect a system of group life, accident
or health insurance, or any combination thereof, for the benefit of its
officers and employees, and the dependents of officers and
employees who elect to accept the insurance and who, where
necessary, have authorized the governing body to make deductions
from their compensation for the payment of premiums on the
insurance.
-
*SB209*

– 22 –
(b) Purchase group policies of life, accident or health insurance,
or any combination thereof, for the benefit of such officers and
employees, and the dependents of such officers and employees, as
have authorized the purchase, from insurance companies authorized
to transact the business of such insurance in the State of Nevada,
and, where necessary, deduct from the compensation of officers and
employees the premiums upon insurance and pay the deductions
upon the premiums.
(c) Provide group life, accident or health coverage through a
self-insurance reserve fund and, where necessary, deduct
contributions to the maintenance of the fund from the compensation
of officers and employees and pay the deductions into the fund. The
money accumulated for this purpose through deductions from the
compensation of officers and employees and contributions of the
governing body must be maintained as an internal service fund as
defined by NRS 354.543. The money must be deposited in a state or
national bank or credit union authorized to transact business in the
State of Nevada. Any independent administrator of a fund created
under this section is subject to the licensing requirements of chapter
683A of NRS, and must be a resident of this State. Any contract
with an independent administrator must be approved by the
Commissioner of Insurance as to the reasonableness of
administrative charges in relation to contributions collected and
benefits provided. The provisions of NRS 439.581 to 439.597,
inclusive, 686A.135, 687B.352, 687B.408, 687B.692, 687B.723,
687B.725, 687B.805, 689B.030 to 689B.0317, inclusive, paragraphs
(b) and (c) of subsection 1 of NRS 689B.0319, subsections 2, 4, 6
and 7 of NRS 689B.0319, 689B.033 to 689B.0369, inclusive,
689B.0375 to 689B.050, inclusive, 689B.0675, 689B.265, 689B.287
and 689B.500 and section 24 of this act apply to coverage provided
pursuant to this paragraph, except that the provisions of NRS
689B.0378, 689B.03785 and 689B.500 only apply to coverage for
active officers and employees of the governing body, or the
dependents of such officers and employees.
(d) Defray part or all of the cost of maintenance of a self-
insurance fund or of the premiums upon insurance. The money for
contributions must be budgeted for in accordance with the laws
governing the county, school district, municipal corporation,
political subdivision, public corporation or other local governmental
agency of the State of Nevada.
2. If a school district offers group insurance to its officers and
employees pursuant to this section, members of the board of trustees
of the school district must not be excluded from participating in the
group insurance. If the amount of the deductions from compensation
-
*SB209*

– 23 –
required to pay for the group insurance exceeds the compensation to
which a trustee is entitled, the difference must be paid by the trustee.
3. In any county in which a legal services organization exists,
the governing body of the county, or of any school district,
municipal corporation, political subdivision, public corporation or
other local governmental agency of the State of Nevada in the
county, may enter into a contract with the legal services
organization pursuant to which the officers and employees of the
legal services organization, and the dependents of those officers and
employees, are eligible for any life, accident or health insurance
provided pursuant to this section to the officers and employees, and
the dependents of the officers and employees, of the county, school
district, municipal corporation, political subdivision, public
corporation or other local governmental agency.
4. If a contract is entered into pursuant to subsection 3, the
officers and employees of the legal services organization:
(a) Shall be deemed, solely for the purposes of this section, to be
officers and employees of the county, school district, municipal
corporation, political subdivision, public corporation or other local
governmental agency with which the legal services organization has
contracted; and
(b) Must be required by the contract to pay the premiums or
contributions for all insurance which they elect to accept or of which
they authorize the purchase.
5. A contract that is entered into pursuant to subsection 3:
(a) Must be submitted to the Commissioner of Insurance for
approval not less than 30 days before the date on which the contract
is to become effective.
(b) Does not become effective unless approved by the
Commissioner.
(c) Shall be deemed to be approved if not disapproved by the
Commissioner within 30 days after its submission.
6. As used in this section, “legal services organization” means
an organization that operates a program for legal aid and receives
money pursuant to NRS 19.031.
Sec. 37. NRS 287.04335 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
287.04335 If the Board provides health insurance through a
plan of self-insurance, it shall comply with the provisions of NRS
439.581 to 439.597, inclusive, 686A.135, 687B.352, 687B.409,
687B.692, 687B.723, 687B.725, 687B.805, 689B.0353, 689B.255,
695C.1723, 695G.150, 695G.155, 695G.160, 695G.162,
695G.1635, 695G.164, 695G.1645, 695G.1665, 695G.167,
695G.1675, 695G.170 to 695G.1712, inclusive, 695G.1714 to
695G.174, inclusive, 695G.176, 695G.177, 695G.200 to 695G.230,
-
*SB209*

– 24 –
inclusive, 695G.241 to 695G.310, inclusive, 695G.405 and
695G.415, and section 33 of this act, in the same manner as an
insurer that is licensed pursuant to title 57 of NRS is required to
comply with those provisions.
Sec. 38. The amendatory provisions of this act do not apply to
any contract or other agreement entered into before January 1, 2026,
but apply to the renewal of any such contract or other agreement.
Sec. 39. The provisions of subsection 1 of NRS 218D.380 do
not apply to any provision of this act which adds or revises a
requirement to submit a report to the Legislature.
Sec. 40. The provisions of NRS 354.599 do not apply to any
additional expenses of a local government that are related to the
provisions of this act.
Sec. 41. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 40, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On January 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
H
-
*SB209*